Hawaii statutes.
[PART
III. ADVANCE PAYMENTS IN PERSONAL INJURY AND

PROPERTY
DAMAGE CASES]

§663-21 Advance payments not admission.
In any action, including a medical tort, as defined in section 671-1, brought
to recover damages for personal injuries, wrongful death or property damage no
payment made by the defendant or the defendant's insurance company, whether
made before or after the complaint is filed, to or for the plaintiff or any
other person, hereinafter called an "advance payment", shall be
construed as an admission of liability by any person. Except as provided in
section 663-22, evidence of such payment shall not be admissible during the
trial for any purpose by either plaintiff or defendant. [L 1969, c 233, §1; am
L 1976, c 219, §19]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next